Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 10 Division of Workforce Services Law
11-10-303. Division of Workforce Services — Employee insurance plans.

The Director of the Division of Workforce Services is authorized to formulate, adopt, and administer plans to provide the regular employees of the Division of Workforce Services, as an incident of their employment, with group life insurance or insurance against the payment of medical and hospital expenses or any similar type of insurance.

Any plan adopted shall be paid pursuant to the contract entered into with one (1) or more insurance companies authorized to do business in this state, and it may require the payment of all or any part of the premium by the division or by the employees.

If any plan adopted requires contributions by the employees, the director may provide for the withholding of the amount of the employees' contribution from their salaries. However, the contributing share of funds paid by the division as the employer shall come from funds granted to the agency by the United States Department of Labor for such purposes.

The plan may provide for the continuation of any insurance provided on the same or on a different basis upon termination of employment or after the retirement of any employee who retires after March 3, 1971, pursuant to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

Any plan adopted shall provide benefits similar to those made available by the United States Government to its employees generally, and the cost thereof per employee shall not exceed the cost per employee that the United States Government pays for similar insurance benefits.

Participation by any employee of the division in any plan adopted shall be on a voluntary basis at the option of the employee.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 220, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1126; Acts 1991, No. 100, §§ 7-9; 2019, No. 910, § 189.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services” in the section heading, and twice in (a); substituted “division” for “Department of Workforce Services” in (b), (c), and (f); and substituted “United States” for “federal” twice in (e).

11-10-304. Arkansas State Employment Service — Creation.

The Arkansas State Employment Service is established within the Division of Workforce Services.

The Director of the Division of Workforce Services, in the conduct of the service, shall establish and maintain free public employment offices in such numbers and in such places as may be necessary for the proper administration of this chapter and for the purpose of performing such functions as are within the purview of the Act of the United States Congress of June 6, 1933, hereinafter referred to as the “Wagner-Peyser Act”.

The provisions of that act of the United States Congress are accepted by this state, and the division is designated and constituted the agency of this state for the purposes of that act.

All moneys received by this state under that act of the United States Congress shall be paid into the Employment Security Administration Fund, § 11-10-320, and shall be expended solely for the maintenance of the state system of public employment offices.

For the purpose of establishing and maintaining free public employment offices and promoting the use of their facilities, the director is authorized to enter into agreements with the United States Railroad Retirement Board, or any other agency of the United States or of this or any other state, charged with the administration of any law whose purposes are reasonably related to the purposes of this chapter.

As a part of such agreements, the director may accept moneys, services, or quarters as a contribution to the maintenance of the state system of public employment offices or as reimbursement for services performed.

All moneys received for these purposes shall be paid into the Employment Security Administration Fund.

In addition to the services and activities otherwise authorized by this chapter, the division may perform, or contract for the performance of, such other services and activities as shall be specified in contracts for payment or reimbursement of the costs thereof made with the United States Secretary of Labor, with any federal, state, or local public agency, or administrative entity, or with any employer or private for-profit or nonprofit organization under, in accordance with, and in furtherance of the purposes of the Job Training Partnership Act, Pub. L. No. 97-300 [repealed].

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 12; 1947, No. 398, § 11; 1949, No. 369, § 8; 1985, No. 8, § 22; 1985, No. 9, § 22; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1115; Acts 1991, No. 100, §§ 10-12; 2019, No. 910, §§ 190, 191.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “within the Division of Workforce Services” for “in the Department of Workforce Services” in (a); in (b), substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” and “the United States Congress” for “Congress”;
in (c), substituted “the United States Congress” for “Congress” and “division” for “department”; and substituted “division” for “department” in (f).

U.S. Code.

The Wagner-Peyser Act referred to in this section is codified as 29 U.S.C. § 49 et seq. The Job Training Partnership Act is codified as 29 U.S.C. § 1501 et seq. [repealed].

11-10-305. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning State Employment Security Advisory Council creation, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 540, § 9. The section was derived from Acts 1941, No. 391, § 11; 1949, No. 155, § 12; 1971, No. 35, § 17; 1975, No. 609, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1114; Acts 1991, No. 100, § 13; 1997, No. 234, § 5; 1997, No. 250, § 60.

11-10-306. Director — Duties and powers generally.

It shall be the duty of the Director of the Division of Workforce Services to administer this chapter.

The director shall have power and authority to adopt, amend, or rescind such rules, employ such persons, make such expenditures, require such reports, make such investigations, and take such other action as he or she deems necessary or suitable to that end.

Beginning on and after January 1, 1995, he or she shall have power and authority to equitably resolve issues involving employers or claimants if the issues are found to be the result of, or due to, agency error.

Rules shall be effective upon publication in the manner, not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, which the director shall prescribe.

The director shall determine his or her own organization and methods of procedure in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and shall have an official seal which shall be judicially noticed.

Not later than June 30 of each year, the director shall submit to the Governor a report covering the administration and operation of this chapter during the preceding calendar year and shall make such recommendations for amendments to this chapter as he or she deems proper.

The reports shall include a balance sheet of the moneys in the funds in which there shall be provided, if possible, a reserve against the liability in future years to pay benefits in excess of the then-current contributions. This reserve shall be set up by the director in accordance with accepted actuarial principles on the basis of statistics of employment, business activity, and other relevant factors for the longest possible period.

Whenever the director believes that a change in contribution or benefit rates will become necessary to protect the solvency of the fund, he or she shall promptly so inform the Governor and the General Assembly, and make recommendations with respect thereto.

The director, in addition to other provisions of this chapter, is authorized to set up and maintain within the Division of Workforce Services a unit known as the “Enforcement Unit”.

The unit may be maintained by a staff adequate to make investigations, hold hearings, and take testimony in connection with the enforcement of this chapter to the end that fraudulent claims on the part of claimants and the violation of this chapter on the part of employers may be curtailed to the minimum possible.

The employees of the unit shall have authority to make audits, investigate records and books of employers, hold hearings, administer oaths, and subpoena witnesses, papers, books, and records in connection with the investigations.

The subpoena shall be effective in any part of this state, and any circuit court either in term time or vacation may by order require additional witnesses or the production of other relevant evidence subpoenaed by the director or any other person duly authorized by the director.

The court may compel obedience to its order by procedure of contempt.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 11; 1953, No. 162, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1114; Acts 1991, No. 100, § 14; 1995, No. 519, § 2; 2019, No. 315, §§ 807, 808; 2019, No. 910, §§ 192, 193.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1953, No. 162, § 16, provided, in part, that this section is not intended to repeal any of the provisions of the Employment Security Act but is intended to be in addition to those provisions.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b)(1) and
(c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a); and, in (g)(1), substituted “within the Division of Workforce Services” for “in the Department of Workforce Services” and “‘Enforcement Unit’” for “enforcement unit”.

11-10-307. Director — Rules.

General and special rules may be adopted, amended, or rescinded by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services only after public hearing or opportunity to be heard thereon, on which proper notice has been given.

General rules shall become effective ten (10) days after filing with the Secretary of State and publication in one (1) or more newspapers of general circulation in this state.

Special rules shall become effective ten (10) days after notification to or mailing to the last known address of the individuals or employing units affected thereby.

Rules may be adopted, amended, or rescinded by the director and shall become effective in the manner and at the time prescribed by the director.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1114; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 809; 2019, No. 910, §
194.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “Rules” for “Regulations” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a)(1).

11-10-308. Director — Administrative determinations of coverage.

The Director of the Division of Workforce Services may, upon his or her own motion or upon application of an employing unit, after notice and opportunity for hearing, make findings of fact and, on the basis thereof, determinations with respect to whether an employing unit constitutes an employer and whether services performed for or in connection with the business of an employing unit constitute employment for that employing unit.

However, the director may at his or her own instance and shall upon the application of any interested party, certify the question of coverage to the Board of Review for its determination.

An appeal may be taken from a determination made by the director to the board on all matters with respect to coverage determined by the director within twenty (20) days after the mailing of notice of the findings and determination to the employing unit or, in the absence of mailing, within twenty (20) days after the delivery of the notice.

If supported by substantial evidence and in the absence of fraud, a determination of the director, in the absence of appeal therefrom, and a determination of the board shall be conclusive except as to errors of law for all purposes of this chapter except as herein otherwise provided and, together with the record therein made, shall be admissible in any subsequent judicial proceeding involving liability for contributions.

A review of the determination made by the director or the board may be had by filing a petition for review in the Court of Appeals within thirty (30) calendar days after the mailing of notice of the determination to the employing unit's last known address, or in the absence of mailing, within thirty (30) calendar days after the delivery of the notice.

A determination of the director which has not been appealed and a determination of the board, as provided for in this section, together with the record thereof, may be introduced in any proceeding involving a claim for benefits.

The facts therein found and the determination therein made shall not be binding if evidence to the contrary is introduced in the hearing on the claim for benefits.

Any party appealing a determination of the director to the board or the court shall be required to file quarterly reports and pay all contributions, penalties, or interest due and owing during the appeal process.

Upon finalization of the appeal, if it is found that no tax is owed or a lesser tax, penalty, or interest is owed, then that amount shall be refunded or credited to the employer's account.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 11; 1943, No. 138, § 14; 1979, No. 252, § 3; 1985, No. 8, § 14; 1985, No. 9, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1114; Acts 1997, No. 234, § 6; 2005, No. 902, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 195.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a).

Participation in Proceedings.

Alleged employer has the right to participate in proceedings. Crossett Lumber Co. v. McCain, 205 Ark. 631, 170 S.W.2d 64 (1943), superseded by statute as stated in, Morris v. Everett, 647 S.W.2d 476 (1983) (decision under prior law).

11-10-309. Director — Publication of rules, reports, etc.

The Director of the Division of Workforce Services shall make available for distribution to the public the text of this chapter, his or her general and special rules, his or her annual report to the Governor, and any other material he or she deems relevant and suitable and shall furnish the materials to any person upon application therefor.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 11; 1985, No. 8, § 15; 1985, No. 9, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1114; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 810; 2019, No. 910, §
196.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulations and” preceding “general”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services”.

11-10-310. Director — Personnel.

Subject to other provisions of this chapter, the Director of the Division of Workforce Services is authorized to appoint, fix the compensation, and prescribe the duties and powers of such officers, accountants, attorneys, experts, and other persons as may be necessary in the performance of his or her duties under this chapter.

The director may delegate to any such person such power and authority as he or she deems reasonable and proper for the effective administration of this chapter and may, in his or her discretion, bond any person handling moneys or signing checks hereunder.

The director is authorized and directed to provide for a merit system covering all persons employed in the administration of this chapter and shall have authority, by rule, to provide for all matters that are appropriate to the maintenance of this system on the basis of efficiency and fitness.

The director is authorized to adopt such rules as may be necessary to meet personnel standards promulgated by the Social Security Board pursuant to the Social Security Act, and the Wagner-Peyser Act, and to provide for the maintenance of the merit system required under this section in conjunction with any merit system applicable to any other state agency which meets the personnel standards promulgated by the board.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1114; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 811; 2019, No. 910, §
197.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (c); and substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (d).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a).

U.S. Code.

The Social Security Act referred to in this section is codified primarily in Title 42 of the U.S. Code. The Wagner-Peyser Act is codified as 29 U.S.C. § 49 et seq.

11-10-311. Employment stabilization.

The Director of the Division of Workforce Services shall take all appropriate steps to reduce and prevent unemployment, to encourage and assist in the adoption of practical methods of vocational training, retraining, and vocational guidance, to investigate, recommend, advise, and assist in the establishment and operation by municipalities, counties, planning districts, school districts, and the state of programs for public works to be used in times and places of economic downturn and high unemployment for the purpose of promoting the employment of unemployed and underemployed workers throughout the state, and to these ends, to carry on research and such investigations as he or she shall deem necessary and to publish the results thereof.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 11; 1975, No. 609, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1114; Acts 1991, No. 100, § 15; 2017, No. 540, § 10; 2019, No. 910, § 198.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment deleted “with the advice and aid of the State Employment Security Advisory Council” following “Workforce Services”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services”.

11-10-312. Federal-state cooperation.

In the administration of this chapter, the Director of the Division of Workforce Services shall cooperate with the United States Department of Labor to the fullest extent consistent with the provisions of this chapter and shall take such action, through the adoption of such appropriate rules, administrative methods, and standards as may be necessary to secure to this state and its citizens all advantages available under the provisions of the Social Security Act that relate to unemployment compensation, the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, the Wagner-Peyser Act, and the Federal-State Extended Unemployment Compensation Act of 1970.

In the administration of the provisions in §§ 11-10-534 — 11-10-543, which are enacted to conform with the requirements of the Federal-State Extended Unemployment Compensation Act of 1970, the director shall take such action as may be necessary to:

Ensure that the provisions are so interpreted and applied as to meet the requirements of the federal act referred to in this subsection as interpreted by the United States Department of Labor; and

Secure to this state the full reimbursement of the federal share of extended benefits paid under this chapter that are reimbursable under the federal act referred to in this subsection.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 11; 1971, No. 35, § 17; 1985, No. 8, § 16; 1985, No. 9, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1114; Acts 2019, No. 315, §
812; 2019, No. 382, § 3; 2019, No. 910, § 199.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 382 deleted “the Job Training Partnership Act” following “the Wagner-Peyser Act” in (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a).

U.S. Code.

Provisions of the Social Security Acts that relate to unemployment compensation are primarily codified in Title 26 of the U.S. Code. The Federal Unemployment Tax Act is codified as 26 U.S.C. § 3301 et seq. The Wagner-Peyser Act is codified as 29 U.S.C. § 49 et seq. The Federal-State Extended Unemployment Compensation Act of 1970 is codified as 26 U.S.C. § 3304.

11-10-313. Compensation based on multiple-state earnings.

The Director of the Division of Workforce Services shall participate in any arrangements for the payment of compensation on the basis of combining an individual's wages and employment covered under this chapter with his or her wages and employment covered under the unemployment compensation laws of other states which are approved by the United States Secretary of Labor in consultation with the state unemployment compensation agencies as reasonably calculated to assure the prompt and full payment of compensation in those situations and which include provisions for:

Applying the base period of a single state law to a claim involving the combining of an individual's wages and employment covered under two (2) or more state unemployment compensation laws; and

Avoiding the duplicate use of wages and employment by reason of such combining.

Any and all wage and employment information necessary for the carrying out of the arrangements shall be promptly provided by employers upon request by the director.

Willful failure to promptly provide the information shall subject an employer to the penalties set forth in § 11-10-106(b).

History.

Acts 1971, No. 35, § 20; 1985, No. 8, § 30; 1985, No. 9, § 30; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1123; Acts 1991, No. 100, § 16; 2019, No. 910, § 200.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in the introductory language of (a).